Hawaii statutes.
§451J-10 Renewal of license. (a)
Licenses shall be renewed triennially on or before December 31, with the
first renewal deadline occurring on December 31, 2001. Failure to renew a
license shall result in a forfeiture of the license. Licenses that have been
forfeited may be restored within one year of the expiration date upon payment
of renewal and restoration fees, and in the case of marriage and family
therapists or licensed marriage and family therapists audited pursuant to
subsection (f), documentation of continuing education compliance. Failure to
restore a forfeited license within one year of the date of its expiration shall
result in the automatic termination of the license. Persons with terminated
licenses shall be required to reapply for licensure as a new applicant.

(b) Beginning with the renewal for the
licensing triennium commencing on January 1, 2017, through December 31, 2019,
and prior to every triennial renewal thereafter, each licensee shall:

(1) Pay all required fees; and

(2) Complete a minimum of forty-five credit hours of
continuing education courses within the three-year period preceding the renewal
date; provided that a minimum of six credit hours shall be in ethics courses.

(c) A first-time licensee shall not be subject
to the continuing education requirement established under subsection (b)(2) for
the first license renewal.

(d) Each licensee shall maintain the
licensee's continuing education records. At the time of renewal, each licensee
shall certify under oath that the licensee has complied with the continuing
education requirement of this section. The director may require a licensee to
submit evidence satisfactory to the director that demonstrates compliance with
the continuing education requirement of this section.

(e) A licensee seeking renewal of a license
without full compliance with the continuing education requirement shall submit
the renewal application, required fee, a notarized affidavit setting forth the
facts explaining the reasons for noncompliance, and a request for an extension
on the basis of the facts; provided that the licensee shall complete at least
ninety hours of continuing education, including at least twelve hours in ethics
courses, prior to the next licensing triennium. The director shall consider
each case on an individual basis and may grant an extension of the continuing
education requirement based upon:

(1) Practice in an isolated geographical area with an
absence of opportunities for continuing education by taped programs or
otherwise; or

(2) Inability to devote sufficient hours to
continuing education because of incapacity, undue hardship, or any other
serious extenuating circumstances.

(f) The director may conduct random audits of
licensees to determine compliance with the continuing education requirement.
The director shall provide written notice of an audit to a licensee randomly
selected for audit. Within sixty days of notification, the licensee shall
provide the director with documentation verifying compliance with the continuing
education requirement established by this section. [L 1998, c 159, pt of §2; am
L 2014, c 28, §3; am L 2016, c 29, §9]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next